Wisconsin, session 2025, AB771.
do enact as follows:AB771,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.AB771,2,24(1) Funding for freshwater collaborative. In the schedule under s. 520.005 (3) for the appropriation to the Board of Regents of the University of 6Wisconsin System under s. 20.285 (1) (ar), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 1is increased by $5,000,000 and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is 2increased by $5,000,000.AB771,2,33